Utah statutes.
39-4-7.   State Defense Force, as such, not subject to United States
military service -- Members not exempt from United States military service.
Nothing in this act shall be construed as authorizing such forces, or any part
thereof to be called, ordered or in any manner drafted, as such into the
military service of the United States, but no person shall by reason of his
enlistment or commission in any such forces be exempted from military service
under any law of the United States.
